Washington statutes.
RCW 22.16.010

Right of eminent domain extended.

The right of eminent domain is hereby extended to corporations incorporated or that may hereafter be incorporated under the laws of this state, or of any other state or territory and qualified to transact business in this state for the purpose of acquiring, owning or operating public warehouses or elevators for storing and handling grain, produce and other agricultural commodities which may desire to secure warehouse or elevator sites or rights-of-way for roadways leading to and from the same or for wharves or boat landings on navigable waters and all other purposes incident to and connected with the business conducted by such warehouse or elevator.

[ 1919 c 98 s 1; RRS s 11566.]